Tennessee statutes. Title 54 Highways, Bridges And Ferries
Part 6

High Priority Bridge Replacement Program

54-4-601. Eligibility.

Eligible bridges shall be those located on public roads under the jurisdiction of a local government, and shall not include bridges located on the state system of highways. Any local government that meets the eligibility requirements in § 54-4-504(c) shall be eligible for participation in the high priority bridge replacement program.

For purposes of this part, “bridge” means a structure on a public road, including supports, erected for carrying traffic over a depression or an obstruction, such as water or a highway or railway, and having an opening measured along the center of the roadway of more than twenty feet (20') between under-copings of abutments or spring lines of arches, or extreme ends of openings for multiple boxes; it may also include multiple pipes, where the clear distance between openings is less than half of the smaller contiguous opening.

Acts 2017, ch. 425, § 2.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 425, § 5. July 1, 2017.

54-4-602. Selection process.

The commissioner of transportation shall establish criteria for the selection of projects to be funded under the high priority bridge replacement program based on the numbers and structural condition of bridges identified through the National Bridge Inventory as compiled by the department of transportation and other relevant information the commissioner may consider appropriate.

Acts 2017, ch. 425, § 2.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 425, § 5. July 1, 2017.

54-4-603. Funding.

Funding for the high priority bridge replacement program shall be separate from funding for the state bridge grant program established in part 5 of this chapter.

The expenditure of funds under this program shall be based on need as determined by the commissioner of transportation and shall not be subject to the formula governing the allocation of funds under the state bridge grant program established in part 5 of this chapter.

The state share payable for a project undertaken pursuant to this part may be up to one hundred percent (100%) of the project cost approved by the department of transportation.

The department of transportation may use funds available through federal, state, or local sources to implement this program.

Acts 2017, ch. 425, § 2.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 425, § 5. July 1, 2017.

54-4-604. Maintenance of projects.

Any project undertaken pursuant to this part shall be maintained by the local government, as defined in § 54-4-502, within whose jurisdiction the project lies.

Acts 2017, ch. 425, § 2.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 425, § 5. July 1, 2017.